Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5939.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 105. (1) "Administrator" means the chief officer of the department or of any other another agency or department authorized by law to administer this act, or his or her the designated representative of the chief officer. (2) "Articles of incorporation" includes any of the following: (a) The original articles of incorporation or any other instrument filed or issued under any statute to organize a domestic or foreign corporation, as amended, supplemented, or restated by certificates of amendment, merger, conversion, or consolidation or other certificates or instruments filed or issued under any statute. (b) A special act or charter creating a domestic or foreign corporation, as amended, supplemented, or restated. (3) "Authorized shares" means shares of all classes that a corporation is authorized to issue. (4) "Benefit corporation" means a domestic corporation that meets the requirements of a benefit corporation under chapter 9A and has not terminated its status as a benefit corporation under that chapter. (5) (4) "Board" means board of directors or other governing board of a corporation. (6) (5) "Bonds" includes secured and unsecured bonds, debentures, and notes. Sec. 106. (1) "Corporation" or "domestic corporation" means a corporation formed under this act, or existing on January 1, 1973 and formed under any other statute of this state for a purpose for which a corporation may be formed under this act. Corporation or domestic corporation includes a benefit corporation. (2) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (3) "Director" means a member of the board of a corporation. (4) "Distribution" means a direct or indirect transfer of money or other property, except the corporation's shares, or the incurrence of indebtedness by the corporation to or for the benefit of its shareholders in respect to the corporation's shares. A distribution may be in the form of a dividend, a purchase, redemption or other acquisition of shares, an issuance of indebtedness, or any other declaration or payment to or for the benefit of the shareholders. (5) "Electronic transmission" or "electronically transmitted" means any form of communication that meets all of the following: (a) It does not directly involve the physical transmission of paper. (b) It creates a record that may be retained and retrieved by the recipient. (c) It may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process. Sec. 107. (1) "Foreign corporation" means a corporation for profit formed under laws other than the laws of this state, which includes in its purposes a purpose for which a corporation may be formed under this act. (2) "Foreign nonprofit corporation" means a corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state, which includes in its purposes a purpose for which a corporation may be organized under the nonprofit corporation act, Act No. 162 of the Public Acts of 1982, being sections 450.2101 to 450.3192 of the Michigan Compiled Laws.1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192. (3) "Independent director" means a director who meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is elected by the shareholders. (b) Is designated as an independent director by the board or the shareholders. (c) Has at least not less than 5 years of business, legal, or financial experience, or other equivalent experience. For a corporation with securities registered under section 12 of the securities exchange act of 1934, chapter 404, 48 Stat . 881, 15 U.S.C. 78L, USC 78l, "experience" shall mean means experience as a senior executive, director, or attorney, or other equivalent experience, for a corporation with registered securities. (d) Is not and during the 3 years prior to before being designated as an independent director has not been any of the following: (i) An officer or employee of the corporation or any affiliate of the corporation. (ii) Engaged in any business transaction for profit or series of transactions for profit, including banking, legal, or consulting services, involving more than $10,000.00 with the corporation or any affiliate of the corporation. (iii) An affiliate, executive officer, general partner, or member of the immediate family of any person that had the status or engaged in a transaction described in subparagraph (i) or (ii). (e) Does not propose to enter into a relationship or transaction described in subdivision (d)(i) through to (iii). (f) Does not have an aggregate of more than 3 years of service as a director of the corporation, regardless of whether or not as an independent director. (4) "Internal affairs" means all of the following: (a) Rights and duties under the laws of the jurisdiction in which a corporation is incorporated that are possessed or owed by a current or former director, officer, or shareholder in such a capacity. (b) Matters governed by, or claims arising under, the statute under which a corporation is incorporated, including the procedural rules for derivative actions or proceedings brought on behalf of the corporation or shareholders, whether found in a statute, court rule, or other source. (c) Matters governed by a corporation's articles of incorporation or bylaws. (d) Matters or claims that are generally interpreted to be governed by the internal affairs doctrine of this state that are not included in subdivisions (a) to (c). Sec. 109. (1) "Services in a learned profession" means services provided to the public by a dentist, an osteopathic physician, a physician, a surgeon, a doctor of divinity or other clergy, or an attorney-at-law. The term does Services in a learned profession do not include services provided to residents of a nursing home, as that term is defined in section 20109 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20109, by a dentist, osteopathic physician, physician, or surgeon who is an employee or independent contractor of the nursing home. (2) "Shareholder" means a person that holds units of proprietary interest in a corporation and is considered to be synonymous with "member" in a nonstock corporation. (3) "Shares" means the units into which proprietary interests in a corporation are divided and is considered to be synonymous with "membership" in a nonstock corporation. (4) "Voting group" means all shares of 1 or more classes or series that, under the articles of incorporation or this act, are entitled to vote and be counted together collectively on a matter at a meeting of shareholders. All shares entitled by the articles of incorporation or this act to vote generally on the matter are, for that purpose, a single voting group. Sec. 131. (1) A document that is required or permitted to be filed under this act shall must be submitted by delivering the document to the administrator together with the fees and accompanying documents required by law. The administrator may establish a procedure for accepting delivery of a document submitted under this subsection by facsimile or other electronic transmission. However, by December 31, 2006, the administrator shall establish a procedure for accepting delivery of a document submitted under this subsection by electronic mail email or over the internet. Beginning January 1, 2007, the administrator shall accept delivery of documents submitted by electronic mail email or over the internet. (2) If a document submitted under subsection (1), other than an annual benefit report under section 961, substantially conforms to the requirements of this act, the administrator shall endorse upon it the document with the word "filed", with his or her the administrator's official title, and the date of receipt and of filing on the document and shall file and index the document or a photostatic, micrographic, photographic, optical disc media, or other reproduced copy of the document in his or her the administrator's office. If requested at the time of the delivery of the document to his or her the administrator's office, the administrator shall include the hour of filing in the endorsement on the document. (3) The administrator may return the original or a copy of a document filed under subsection (2) to the person that submitted it for filing. The administrator shall mark the filing date on the copy or original before returning it or may provide proof of the filing date to the person that submitted the document for filing in another manner determined by the administrator. (4) The records and files of the administrator relating to domestic and foreign corporations shall must be open to reasonable inspection by the public. The administrator may maintain records or files in their the records' or files' original form or may maintain records or files in the form of reproductions pursuant to in accordance with the records reproduction act, 1992 PA 116, MCL 24.401 to 24.406, and may destroy the originals of the reproduced documents. (5) The administrator may make reproductions of any documents filed under this act or any predecessor act pursuant to in accordance with the records reproduction act, 1992 PA 116, MCL 24.401 to 24.406, and may destroy the originals of the reproduced documents. A reproduced copy of a document certified by the administrator, including a copy sent by facsimile or other electronic transmission, is considered an original document for all purposes and is admissible in evidence in like manner as an original document. (6) Except as provided in section 806, a document filed under subsection (2) is effective at the time it is endorsed unless a subsequent effective time, not later than 90 days after the date of delivery, is set forth stated in the document. (7) The administrator shall charge 1 of the following nonrefundable fees if expedited filing of a document by the administrator is requested and the administrator shall retain the revenue collected under this subsection and the department shall use it to carry out its duties required by law: (a) For any filing that a person requests the administrator to complete within 1 hour on the same day as the day of the request, $1,000.00. The department may establish a deadline by which a person must submit a request for filing under this subdivision. (b) For any filing that a person requests the administrator to complete within 2 hours on the same day as the day of the request, $500.00. The department may establish a deadline by which a person must submit a request for filing under this subdivision. (c) Except for a filing request under subdivision (a) or (b), for the filing of any formation or qualification document that a person requests the administrator to complete on the same day as the day of the request, $100.00. The department may establish a deadline by which a person must submit a request for filing under this subdivision. (d) Except for a filing request under subdivision (a) or (b), for the filing of any other document concerning an existing domestic corporation or a qualified foreign corporation that a person requests the administrator to complete on the same day as the day of the request, $200.00. The department may establish a deadline by which a person must submit a request for filing under this subdivision. (e) For the filing of any formation or qualification document that a person requests the administrator to complete within not later than 24 hours of the time after the administrator receives the request, $50.00. (f) For the filing of any other document concerning an existing domestic corporation or a qualified foreign corporation that a person requests the administrator to complete within not later than 24 hours of the time after the administrator receives the request, $100.00. Sec. 143. (1) If a notice or communication is required or permitted under this act to be given by mail, it shall the notice or communication must be mailed, except as otherwise provided in this act, to the person to which it is directed at the address designated by the person for that purpose or, if none is designated, at the person's last known address. The notice or communication is given when deposited, with postage prepaid, in a post office or official depository under the exclusive care and custody of the United States Postal Service. Unless the corporation has securities registered under section 12 of title 1 of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78l, the mailing shall must be sent by registered, certified, or other first-class mail except unless otherwise required under this act. (2) If a corporation is required or permitted to provide its shareholders with a written notice or other written report, statement, or communication under this act, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws, the corporation may provide that notice, report, statement, or communication to all shareholders that share a common address by delivering 1 copy of it to the common address if all of the following are met: (a) The corporation addresses the notice, report, statement, or communication to the shareholders that share the common address as a group, individually, or in any other form to which any of those shareholders have not objected. (b) At least Not less than 60 days before the first delivery of any delivery to a common address under this subsection, the corporation gives notice to the shareholders that share that common address that it intends to provide only 1 copy of notices, reports, statements, or other communications to shareholders that share a common address. (c) The corporation has not received a written objection from any shareholder that shares a common address to deliveries under this subsection to that shareholder. If it receives a written objection under this subdivision, the corporation within 30 days shall begin providing the objecting shareholder with separate copies of any notices, reports, statements, or communications to the shareholders, but the corporation may deliver 1 copy of the notices, reports, statements, or communications to all of the shareholders at that common address that have not objected. (3) If a notice is required or permitted under this act to be given in writing, electronic transmission is written notice. (4) If a notice or communication is permitted under this act to be transmitted electronically, the notice or communication is given when electronically transmitted to the either of the following: (a) A person that is entitled to the notice or communication in a manner authorized by the person. (b) A shareholder that is entitled to the notice or communication to the email address for the shareholder as it appears on the records of the corporation, unless the shareholder has previously notified the corporation in writing that it objects to receiving notices and communications by email. (5) A notice may not be electronically transmitted after the corporation is unable to deliver by such electronic transmission 2 consecutive notices and the inability to electronically transmit becomes known to the secretary, an assistant secretary of the corporation, the transfer agent, or any other person responsible for giving of notice, provided the inadvertent failure to discover the inability does not invalidate any meeting or other action. (6) (5) As used in subsection (2), "address" means a street address, post office box, electronic mail email address for electronic transmissions by electronic mail, email, or telephone facsimile number for electronic transmissions by facsimile. (7) (6) If the administrator is required under this act to give notice to the corporation, the administrator may electronically transmit the notice to the corporation's resident agent in the manner authorized by the corporation. Sec. 152. As used in sections 152 to 159: (a) "Corporate action" means an action taken by or on behalf of a corporation, including, but not limited to, any action taken by the incorporator, the board, a committee of the board, an officer or agent of the corporation, or the shareholders. (b) "Date of the defective corporate action" means the date, or the approximate date if the exact date is unknown, that a defective corporate action was purported to have been taken. (c) "Defective corporate action" means either of the following: (i) A corporate action purportedly taken that is, and at the time the corporate action was purportedly taken would have been, within the power of the corporation, without regard to the failure of authorization identified in section 154(1)(c), but is void or voidable due to a failure of authorization. (ii) An overissue. (d) "Failure of authorization" means the failure to authorize, approve, or otherwise effect a corporate action in compliance with this act, the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a corporate resolution, or any plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party, if and to the extent the failure would render the corporate action void or voidable. (e) "Overissue" means the purported issuance of either of the following: (i) Shares of a class or series in excess of the number of shares of a class or series the corporation has the power to issue under section 301 at the time of issuance. (ii) Shares of any class or series that the corporation is not authorized to issue at the time of issuance by the articles of incorporation. (f) "Putative shares" means the shares of any class or series, including shares issued on exercise of rights, options, warrants, or other securities convertible into shares of the corporation, or interests with respect to such shares, that were created or issued as a result of a defective corporate action, that, but for a failure of authorization, would constitute valid shares, or that cannot be determined by the board to be valid shares. (g) "Valid shares" means the shares of any class or series that have been duly authorized and validly issued in accordance with this act, including as a result of ratification or validation under sections 152 to 159. (h) "Validation effective time" means the later of either of the following: (i) The time at which the ratification of a defective corporate action is approved by the shareholders or, if approval of shareholders is not required, the time at which the notice required by section 156 is given in accordance with section 143. (ii) The time at which a certificate of validation filed in accordance with section 158 becomes effective. Sec. 153. (1) A defective corporate action is not void or voidable if ratified in accordance with section 154 or validated in accordance with section 159. (2) Ratification under section 154 or validation under section 159 is not the exclusive means of ratifying or validating a defective corporate action, and the absence or failure of ratification in accordance with sections 153 to 159 does not alone affect the validity or effectiveness of a corporate action properly ratified under common law or otherwise. The absence or failure of ratification does not create a presumption that a corporate action is or was a defective corporate action or is void or voidable. (3) In the case of an overissue, putative shares are valid shares effective as of the date originally issued or purportedly issued on either of the following: (a) The effectiveness under sections 153 to 159 and under chapter 6 of an amendment to the articles of incorporation authorizing, designating, or creating the putative shares. (b) The effectiveness of any other corporate action under sections 153 to 159 ratifying the authorization, designation, or creation of the putative shares. Sec. 154. (1) To ratify a defective corporate action, other than the ratification of a selection of the initial board of directors under subsection (2), the board shall take action in accordance with section 155, specifying in the action all of the following: (a) The defective corporate action to be ratified and, if the defective corporate action involved the issuance of putative shares, the number and type of putative shares purportedly issued. (b) The date of the defective corporate action. (c) The nature of the failure of authorization with respect to the defective corporate action to be ratified. (d) That the board approves the ratification of the defective corporate action. (2) In the event that a defective corporate action to be ratified relates to the selection of the initial board of directors of the corporation under section 223, a majority of the individuals who, at the time of the ratification, are exercising the powers of directors may take an action stating all of the following: (a) The name of the individual or individuals who first took action in the name of the corporation as the initial board of directors of the corporation. (b) The earlier of the date on which the individual or individuals under subdivision (a) first took such action or were purported to have been selected as the initial board of directors. (c) That the ratification of the selection of an individual or individuals under subdivision (a) as the initial board of directors is approved. (3) If this act, the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, a corporate resolution, or a plan or agreement to which the corporation is a party and that is in effect at the time an action under subsection (1) is taken requires shareholder approval or would have required shareholder approval at the date of the occurrence of the defective corporate action, the ratification of the defective corporate action approved in the action taken under subsection (1) must be submitted to the shareholders for approval in accordance with section 155. Shareholder approval is not required if, as of the time an action is taken under subsection (1), there are no valid shares outstanding, regardless of whether there exist any putative shares at that time. (4) Unless otherwise provided in the action under subsection (1), after the action has been taken by the board and, if required, approved by the shareholders, the board may abandon the ratification at any time before the validation effective time without further action of the shareholders. Sec. 155. (1) The quorum and voting requirements applicable to a ratifying action by the board under section 154(1) are the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the corporate action proposed to be ratified at the time the ratifying action is taken. (2) If the ratification of a defective corporate action requires approval by the shareholders under section 154(3), and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each holder of valid shares and putative shares, regardless of whether the shareholder is entitled to vote, as of the record date for notice of the meeting and as of the date of the occurrence of the defective corporate action. Notice under this subsection is not required to be given to holders of valid shares or putative shares whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation. The notice must state that the purpose, or 1 of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider ratification of a defective corporate action and must be accompanied by both of the following: (a) A copy of the action taken by the board in accordance with section 154(1) or the information required by section 154(1)(a) to (d). (b) A statement that a claim that the ratification of the defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of the defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, must be brought not later than 120 days after the applicable validation effective time. (3) Except as provided in subsection (4) with respect to the voting requirements to ratify the election of a director, the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the approval by the shareholders required under section 154(3) are the quorum and voting requirements applicable to the corporate action proposed to be ratified at the time of shareholder approval. (4) The approval by shareholders to ratify the election of a director requires that the votes cast within the voting group favoring the ratification exceed the votes cast opposing the ratification of the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present. (5) Putative shares on the record date for determining the shareholders entitled to vote on a matter submitted to shareholders under section 154(3), and without giving effect to any ratification of putative shares that becomes effective as a result of a vote, are not entitled to vote and are not counted for quorum purposes in any vote to approve the ratification of a defective corporate action. (6) If the approval under this section of putative shares would result in an overissue, in addition to the approval required by section 154, approval of an amendment to the articles of incorporation under chapter 6 of this act to increase the number of shares of an authorized class or series or to authorize the creation of a class or series of shares so there would be no overissue is required and must be filed in accordance with section 158. Sec. 156. (1) Unless shareholder approval is required under section 154(3), prompt notice of an action taken under section 154 must be given to each holder of valid shares and putative shares, regardless of whether the shareholder is entitled to vote, as of the date of the action by the board and as of the date of the defective corporate action ratified. Notice is not required to be given to holders of valid shares and putative shares whose identities or addresses for notice cannot be determined from the records of the corporation. (2) The notice under subsection (1) must contain both of the following: (a) A copy of the action taken by the board in accordance with section 154(1) or (2) or the information required by section 154(1)(a) to (d) or section 154(2)(a) to (c), as applicable. (b) A statement that a claim that the ratification of the defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of such defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, must be brought not later than 120 days after the applicable validation effective time. (3) A notice is not required under this section with respect to any action required to be submitted to shareholders for approval under section 154(3) if notice is given in accordance with section 155(2). (4) A notice required by this section may be given in any manner permitted by section 143 and, for a corporation subject to the reporting requirements of section 13 or section 15(d) of the securities exchange act of 1934, 15 USC 78m and 78o, may be given by means of filing or furnishing the notice with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Sec. 157. Beginning on the date of the validation effective time, and without regard to the 120-day period during which a claim may be brought under section 159, all of the following apply: (a) Each defective corporate action ratified in accordance with section 154 is not void or voidable as a result of the failure of authorization identified in the action taken under section 154(1) or (2) and is considered a valid corporate action effective as of the date of the defective corporate action. (b) The issuance of each putative share or fraction of a putative share purportedly issued under a defective corporate action identified in the action taken under section 154 is not void or voidable, and each such putative share or fraction of a putative share is considered to be an identical share or fraction of a valid share as of the time it was purportedly issued. (c) Any corporate action taken subsequent to the defective corporate action ratified in accordance with section 154 in reliance on that defective corporate action having been validly effected, and any subsequent defective corporate action resulting directly or indirectly from the original defective corporate action, is valid as of the time taken. Sec. 158. (1) If a defective corporate action ratified under section 154 would have required a filing under any other section of this act, then, regardless of whether a filing was previously made in respect of that defective corporate action and instead of a filing otherwise required by this act, the corporation shall file a certificate of validation. A certificate of validation serves to amend or substitute for any other filing with respect to the defective corporate action as required under this act. (2) The certificate of validation under subsection (1) must include all of the following: (a) The defective corporate action that is the subject of the certificate of validation, including, in the case of any defective corporate action involving the issuance of putative shares, the number and type of putative shares issued and the date or dates on which the putative shares were purported to have been issued. (b) The date of the defective corporate action. (c) The nature of the failure of authorization in respect of the defective corporate action. (d) A statement that the defective corporate action was ratified in accordance with section 154, including the date on which the board ratified the defective corporate action and the date, if any, on which the shareholders approved the ratification of the defective corporate action. (e) If a filing was previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and no changes to that filing are required to give effect to the ratification of the defective corporate action in accordance with section 154, both of the following: (i) The name, title, and filing date of the filing previously made and any certificate of correction to that filing. (ii) A statement that a copy of the filing previously made, together with any certificate of correction to that filing, is attached as an exhibit to the certificate of validation. (f) If a filing was previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and that filing requires any change to give effect to the ratification of the defective corporate action in accordance with section 154, all of the following: (i) The name, title, and filing date of the filing previously made and any certificate of correction to that filing. (ii) A statement that a filing containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable section or sections of this act to give effect to the defective corporate action is attached as an exhibit to the certificate of validation. (iii) The date and time that the filing is considered to have become effective. (g) If a filing was not previously made in respect of the defective corporate action and the defective corporate action ratified under section 154 would have required a filing under any other section of this act, both of the following: (i) A statement that a filing containing all of the information required to be included under the applicable sections of this act to give effect to the defective corporate action is attached as an exhibit to the certificate of validation. (ii) The date and time that the filing is considered to have become effective. (h) In the case of an overissue contemplated by section 155(6), the amendment or amendments to the corporation's articles of incorporation approved in accordance with that subsection. Sec. 159. (1) On application by a corporation, a successor entity to the corporation, a director of the corporation, a shareholder, a beneficial shareholder, an unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner of the corporation, including any such shareholder, beneficial shareholder, or unrestricted voting trust beneficial owner as of the date of the defective corporate action ratified under section 154, or any other person claiming to be substantially and adversely affected by a ratification under section 154, the circuit court may do any of the following: (a) Determine the validity and effectiveness of a corporate action or defective corporate action. (b) Determine the validity and effectiveness of a ratification under section 154. (c) Determine the validity of any putative shares. (d) Modify or waive any of the procedures specified in section 154 or 155 to ratify a defective corporate action. (e) Make findings or orders, and take into account any factors or considerations, regarding matters the court considers proper under the circumstances. (2) Service of process of the application under subsection (1) on a corporation may be made in any manner provided by statute or by rule of the applicable court for service on the corporation, and another party does not need to be joined for the court to adjudicate the matter. In an action filed by a corporation, the court may require notice of the action be provided to other persons specified by the court and permit such persons to intervene in the action. (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section or otherwise under applicable law, an action asserting that the ratification of a defective corporate action and any putative shares issued as a result of a defective corporate action should not be effective, or should be effective only on certain conditions, must be brought not later than 120 days after the validation effective time. (4) The validation effective time of a defective corporate action that is ratified under section 154 is not affected by the filing or pendency of a judicial proceeding under this section, unless otherwise ordered by the court. Sec. 202. The articles of incorporation shall must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the corporation. (b) The purposes for which the corporation is formed. All of the following apply for purposes of this subdivision: (i) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii), or (iii), or (iv), it is a sufficient compliance sufficiently compliant with this subdivision to state substantially, alone or with specifically enumerated purposes, that the corporation may engage in any activity within the purposes for which corporations a corporation may be formed under the business corporation this act, and all activities shall must by the statement be considered within the purposes of the corporation, subject to expressed limitations. (ii) Any corporation that proposes to conduct educational purposes shall state the purposes and shall comply with all requirements of sections 170 to 177 of 1931 PA 327, MCL 450.170 to 450.177. (iii) A professional corporation shall comply with section 283(2) and (3). (iv) The purpose of a benefit corporation must comply with section 953. (c) The aggregate number of shares that the corporation has authority to issue. (d) If the shares are, or are to be, divided into classes, or into classes and series, the designation of each class and series, the number of shares in each class and series, and a statement of the relative rights, preferences, and limitations of the shares of each class and series, to the extent that the designations, numbers, relative rights, preferences, and limitations have been determined. (e) If the shares are to be designated and issued in 1 or more classes or series, a statement of any authority vested in the board to designate and issue shares in 1 or more classes or series, and to determine or change for any class or series its designation, number of shares, relative rights, preferences, and limitations. (f) Except as otherwise provided in section 611(2)(c), the street address, and the mailing address if different from the street address, of the corporation's initial registered office and the name of the corporation's initial resident agent at that address. (g) The names and addresses of the incorporators. (h) The duration of the corporation if other than perpetual. Sec. 209. (1) The articles of incorporation may contain any provision not inconsistent with this act or another statute of this state, including any of the following: (a) A provision for management of the business and conduct of the affairs of the corporation, or creating, defining, limiting, or regulating the powers of the corporation, its directors and shareholders, or a class of shareholders. (b) A provision that under this act is required or permitted to be set forth in the bylaws. (c) A provision eliminating or limiting a director's or officer's liability to the corporation or its shareholders for money damages for any action taken or any failure to take any action as a director or officer, except liability for any of the following: (i) The amount of a financial benefit received by a director or officer to which he or she the director or officer is not entitled. (ii) Intentional A director's or officer's intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders. (iii) A director's violation of section 551. (iv) An A director's or officer's intentional criminal act. (d) A provision renouncing any interest or expectancy of the corporation in, or in being offered an opportunity to participate in, 1 or more classes or categories of a business opportunity. (2) If the articles of incorporation contain a provision eliminating the liability of a director prior to the amendatory act that amended subsection (1) and added this subsection, before October 24, 1997, that provision shall be considered to eliminate eliminates the liability of a director as provided in subsection (1)(c). (3) A provision in the articles of incorporation may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director or officer for any act or omission that occurs before the date when the provision becomes effective. A provision in the articles of incorporation may apply to both directors and officers, to directors but not officers, or to officers but not directors. Unless a provision in the articles of incorporation refers to officers, the provision does not eliminate or limit the liability of an officer, provided that, to the extent that, before the amendatory act that added this subsection, a corporation's articles of incorporation contained a limitation of liability of directors under subsection (1)(c), the corporation's bylaws may contain a limitation of liability of officers. (4) As used in this section, "officer" means any of the following individuals: (a) An individual who is or was the president, chief executive officer, chief operating officer, chief financial officer, chief legal officer, secretary, controller, treasurer, or chief accounting officer of the corporation at any time during the course of conduct alleged in the action or proceeding to be wrongful. (b) An individual who is or was identified in the corporation's public filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission because the individual is or was 1 of the most highly compensated executive officers of the corporation at any time during the course of conduct alleged in the action or proceeding to be wrongful. (c) An individual or position that the board by resolution designates as being, or being held by, an officer for purposes of this section. The board may from time to time by resolution change the persons or positions designated as officers, but this change does not impair the right of any individual to exculpation with respect to any action or omission before the change. Sec. 211. (1) Except as otherwise provided in chapter 2A for a professional corporation and in subsection (2) for a benefit corporation, the corporate name of a domestic corporation shall must contain the word "corporation", "company", "incorporated", or "limited" or shall must contain 1 of the following abbreviations: corp., co., inc., or ltd., with or without periods. (2) The corporate name of a benefit corporation must contain the words "benefit corporation" or "benefit company" or must contain the initials "B.C.", with or without periods. Sec. 261. A corporation, subject to any limitation provided in this act, in any other statute of this state, or in its articles of incorporation, shall have has power in furtherance of its corporate purposes to do all of the following: (a) Have perpetual duration. (b) Sue and be sued in all courts and participate in actions and proceedings, judicial, administrative, arbitrative, or otherwise, in the same manner as natural persons. (c) Have a corporate seal, and alter the seal, and use it by causing it or a facsimile to be affixed, impressed, or reproduced in any other manner. (d) Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws, including emergency bylaws, relating to the business of the corporation, the conduct of its affairs, its rights and powers and the rights and powers of its shareholders, directors, or officers. (e) Elect or appoint officers, employees, and other agents of the corporation, prescribe their the duties of the officers, employees, and agents, fix their the compensation of the officers, employees, and agents and the compensation of directors, and indemnify corporate directors, officers, employees, and agents. (f) Purchase, receive, take by grant, gift, devise, bequest or otherwise, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, employ, use and otherwise deal in and with, real or personal property, or an interest in real or personal property, wherever situated. (g) Sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer, or otherwise dispose of, or mortgage or pledge, or create a security interest in any of its property or an interest in its property, wherever situated. (h) Purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, employ, sell, lend, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, mortgage, pledge, use and otherwise deal in and with, bonds and other obligations, shares or other securities or interests issued by others, whether engaged in similar or different business, governmental, or other activities, including banking corporations or trust companies. A corporation organized or transacting business in this state under this act shall not guarantee or become surety upon on a bond or other undertaking securing the deposit of public money. (i) Make contracts, give guarantees and incur liabilities, borrow money at rates of interest as the corporation may determine, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property or an interest in its property, wherever situated. This power shall include includes the power to give guarantees that are necessary or convenient to the conduct, promotion, or attainment of the business of any of the following corporations, regardless of whether or not subject to this act, and domestic or foreign limited liability companies or other business entities, and those guarantees shall must be considered to be in furtherance of the corporate purposes of the contracting corporation: (i) All of the outstanding shares or interests of which are owned, directly or indirectly, by the contracting corporation. (ii) A corporation, or limited liability company, or other business entity that owns, directly or indirectly, all of the outstanding shares of the contracting corporation. (iii) All of the outstanding shares or interests of which are owned, directly or indirectly, by a corporation, regardless of whether or not subject to this act, or a limited liability company or other business entity that owns, directly or indirectly, all of the outstanding shares of the contracting corporation. (j) Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested. (k) Make donations for any of the following: The public welfare; community fund or hospital; or a charitable, educational, scientific, civic, or similar purpose. A corporation also has the power to provide aid in time of war or other national emergency. (l) Pay pensions, establish and carry out pension, profit sharing, share bonus, share purchase, share option, savings, thrift and other retirement, incentive and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any of its directors, officers, and employees. (m) Purchase, receive, take, otherwise acquire, own, hold, sell, lend, exchange, transfer, otherwise dispose of, pledge, use and otherwise deal in and with its own shares, bonds, and other securities. (n) Participate with others in any corporation, partnership, limited partnership, joint venture, or other association of any kind, or in any transaction, undertaking, or agreement which the participating corporation would have power to conduct by itself, regardless of whether or not the participation involves sharing or delegation of control with or to others. (o) Cease its corporate activities and dissolve. (p) Transact business, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this act in any jurisdiction in or outside the United States. (q) Have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any purpose for which the corporation is formed. (r) Participate as a member of any mutual insurance company for purposes of insuring property or activities relative to nuclear facilities owned, operated, constructed, or being constructed by the corporation. Sec. 288. (1) A professional corporation shall not issue any of its capital stock to anyone other than a person that is eligible to be a shareholder of the professional corporation under section 283(2). The uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703, does not apply to the issuance or transfer by a professional corporation of its capital stock. (2) Shares of a professional corporation shall must not be sold or transferred to anyone other than a person that is eligible to be a shareholder of the professional corporation under section 283(2); to the personal representative or estate of a deceased or legally incompetent shareholder; or to a trust or split interest trust in which the trustee and the current income beneficiary are each eligible to be a shareholder of the professional corporation under section 283(2). The personal representative or estate of the deceased or legally incompetent shareholder or, if a successor trustee or current income beneficiary of a trust or split interest trust is ineligible to be a shareholder of the professional corporation, the trust may continue to own shares for a reasonable period but is not authorized to participate in any decisions concerning the providing of professional service by the professional corporation. (3) Except as permitted under subsection (2), a shareholder of a professional corporation shall not enter into a voting trust agreement or any other type of agreement that vests another person with the authority to exercise the voting power of any or all of his or her the shareholder's stock, unless that other person is eligible to be a shareholder of the professional corporation under section 283(2). (4) The articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a contract may provide specifically for additional restrictions on the transfer of shares and may provide for the redemption or purchase of the shares by the professional corporation or its shareholders at prices and in a manner specifically set forth in the articles, bylaws, or contract. Sec. 404. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this act, written notice of the time, place if any, and purposes of a meeting of shareholders shall must be given in accordance with section 143 not less than 10 nor or more than 60 days before the date of the meeting to each shareholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting. Notice may be given personally, by mail, or by electronic transmission. If a shareholder or proxy holder may be present and vote at the meeting by remote communication, the means of remote communication allowed shall must be included in the notice. (2) Unless the corporation has securities registered under section 12 of title I of the securities exchange act of 1934, chapter 404, 48 Stat . 892, 15 U.S.C. USC 78l, notice of the purposes of a meeting shall must include notice of shareholder proposals that are proper subjects for shareholder action and are intended to be presented by shareholders who have notified the corporation in writing of their the shareholders' intention to present the proposals at the meeting. The bylaws may establish reasonable procedures for the submission of proposals to the corporation in advance of the meeting. (3) If Unless the bylaws otherwise require, when a meeting is adjourned to another time or place, including an adjournment taken to address a technical failure to convene or continue a meeting using remote communication, it is not necessary , unless the bylaws otherwise provide, to give notice of the adjourned meeting if the time, and place if any, to which the meeting is adjourned and the means of remote communication, if any, by which shareholders and proxy holders may be considered present and to vote at such adjourned meetings, are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken, displayed during the time scheduled for the meeting on the same electronic network, if any, used to enable shareholders and proxy holders to participate in the meeting by means of remote communication, or set forth in the notice of the meeting given in accordance with subsection (1). A shareholder or proxy holder may be present and vote at the adjourned meeting by a means of remote communication if he or she the shareholder or proxy holder was permitted to be present and vote by that means of remote communication in the original meeting notice. At the adjourned meeting, only business that might have been transacted at the original meeting may be transacted if a notice of the adjourned meeting is not given. If after the adjournment the board fixes a new record date for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall must be given to each shareholder of record on the new record date entitled to notice under subsection (1). (4) A shareholder's attendance at a meeting will result results in both of the following: (a) Waiver of objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting. (b) Waiver of objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented. Sec. 413. (1) The officer or agent having charge of the stock transfer books for shares of a corporation shall make and certify a complete list of the shareholders entitled to vote at a shareholders' meeting or any adjourned shareholders' meeting. The list shall must be all of the following: (a) Arranged alphabetically within each class and series, with the address of and the number of shares held by each shareholder. A corporation is not required to include email addresses or other electronic contact information. (b) Produced at the time and place of Open to examination by any shareholder for any purpose germane to the meeting for a period of 10 days ending on the day before the meeting at either of the following locations: (i) On a reasonably accessible electronic network, provided that the information required to gain access to the list is provided with the notice of the meeting. A corporation must take reasonable steps to ensure that information made available under this subparagraph is available only to shareholders of the corporation. (ii) At the principal place of business of the corporation during ordinary business hours. (c) Subject to inspection by any shareholder during the entire meeting. If the meeting is held solely by means of remote communication, then the list shall be open to the examination of any shareholder during the entire meeting by posting the list on a reasonably accessible electronic network and the information required to access the list shall be provided with the notice of the meeting. (c) (d) Prima facie evidence as to who are the shareholders entitled to examine the list or to vote at the meeting. (2) If the requirements of this section have not been complied with, and a shareholder present in person or by proxy in good faith challenges the existence of sufficient votes to carry any action at the meeting, the meeting shall must be adjourned until the requirements are complied with. Failure to comply with the requirements of this section does not affect the validity of an action taken at the meeting before a challenge described in this subsection. Sec. 441. (1) Each outstanding share is entitled to 1 vote on each matter submitted to a vote of the shareholders, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation. A vote may be cast either orally or in writing, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws. (2) Other than the election of directors, if an action is to be taken by vote of the shareholders, it shall must be authorized by a majority of the votes cast by the holders of shares entitled to vote on the action, unless a greater vote is required in the articles of incorporation or another section of this act. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, abstaining from a vote or submitting a ballot marked "abstain" with respect to an action is not a vote cast on that action. Unless otherwise provided in the articles, directors shall be elected by a plurality of the votes cast at an election. (3) If a corporation's articles of incorporation provide for more or less than 1 vote for any share entitled to vote on any matter, every reference in this act requiring or conditioning adoption or approval of any matter by or on the approval or affirmative vote of a majority or other proportion of outstanding shares entitled to vote, or of the holders of a majority or other proportion of the outstanding shares entitled to vote, means such majority or other proportion of the votes entitled to be cast by such shares. Sec. 489. (1) A shareholder may bring an action in the circuit court of the county in which the principal place of business or registered office of the corporation is located to establish that the acts of the directors or those in control of the corporation are illegal , or fraudulent , or constitute willfully unfair and oppressive to conduct toward the corporation or to the shareholder. If the shareholder establishes grounds for relief, the circuit court may make an order or grant relief as it considers appropriate, including, without limitation, an order providing for any of the following: (a) The dissolution and liquidation of the assets and business of the corporation. (b) The cancellation or alteration of a provision contained in the articles of incorporation, an amendment of the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws of the corporation. (c) The cancellation, alteration, or injunction against a resolution or other act of the corporation. (d) The direction or prohibition of an act of the corporation or of shareholders, directors, officers, or other persons party to the action. (e) The purchase at fair value of the shares of a shareholder, either by the corporation or by the officers, directors, or other shareholders responsible for the wrongful acts. (f) An award of damages to the corporation or a shareholder. An action seeking an award of damages must be commenced within not later than 3 years after the cause of action under this section has accrued, or within not later than 2 years after the shareholder discovers or reasonably should have discovered the cause of action under this section, whichever occurs first. (2) No An action under this section shall may not be brought by a shareholder whose shares are listed on a national securities exchange or regularly traded in a market maintained by 1 or more members of a national or affiliated securities association. (3) As used in this section, "willfully unfair and oppressive conduct" means a continuing course of conduct or a significant action or series of actions that substantially interferes with the interests of the shareholder as a shareholder. Willfully unfair and oppressive conduct may include the termination of employment or limitations on employment benefits to the extent that the actions interfere with distributions or other shareholder interests disproportionately as to the affected shareholder. The term Willfully unfair and oppressive conduct does not include conduct or actions that are permitted by an agreement, the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, or a consistently applied written corporate policy or procedure. Sec. 505. (1) The board shall must consist of 1 or more members, each of whom must be a natural person. The bylaws must fix the number of directors shall be fixed by, or in or establish the manner provided in, the bylaws, for fixing the number of directors, unless the articles of incorporation fix the number or establish the manner for fixing the number of directors. (2) The first board of directors shall hold office until the first annual meeting of shareholders. At the first annual meeting of shareholders and at each subsequent annual meeting, thereafter, the shareholders shall elect directors to hold office until the succeeding annual meeting, except in case of the classification of directors as permitted by this act. A director shall hold office for the term for which he or she the director is elected and until his or her the director's successor is elected and qualified, or until his or her the director's resignation or removal. A director may resign by written notice to the corporation. The A resignation of a director is effective upon its receipt when it is received by the corporation or at a later time as set forth if a later time is stated in the notice of resignation. (3) The shareholders or board may designate 1 or more directors as an independent director. Any director so designated shall be as an independent director is entitled to reasonable compensation in addition to compensation paid to directors generally, as determined by the board or shareholders, and reimbursement for expenses reasonably related to service as an independent director. An independent director may communicate with shareholders at the corporation's expense, as part of a communication or report sent by the corporation to shareholders. An independent director shall not have any greater duties or liabilities than any other director. Sec. 531. (1) The officers of a corporation shall must consist of a president, secretary, treasurer, and, if desired, a chairman of the board, 1 or more vice-presidents, and such other officers as may be prescribed by the bylaws or determined by the board. Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, the officers shall must be elected or appointed by the board, except that an officer may appoint 1 or more officers if authorized by the bylaws or the board. (2) Two or more offices may be held by the same person but an officer shall not execute, acknowledge, or verify an instrument in more than 1 capacity if the instrument is required by law or the articles or bylaws to be executed, acknowledged, or verified by 2 or more officers. (3) An officer elected or appointed as herein provided in this section shall hold office for the term for which he the officer is elected or appointed and until his the officer's successor is elected or appointed and qualified, or until his the officer's resignation or removal. (4) An officer, as between himself the officer and other officers and the corporation, has such the authority and shall perform such the duties in the management of the corporation as may be provided in the bylaws, or, as may be determined by resolution of to the extent consistent with the bylaws, the duties prescribed by the board not inconsistent with the bylaws.or by direction of an officer authorized by the board to prescribe the duties of other officers. Sec. 535. (1) An Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an officer elected or appointed by the board may be removed by the board at any time with or without cause by the board, the appointing officer unless the bylaws or the board provided otherwise, or any other officer if authorized by the bylaws or the board. An officer elected by the shareholders may be removed, with or without cause, only by vote of the shareholders, but his the officer's authority to act as an officer may be suspended by the board for cause. As used in this subsection, "appointing officer" means the officer, including a successor to that officer, who appointed the officer being removed. (2) The removal of an officer shall be is without prejudice to his the officer's contract rights, if any. The election or appointment of an officer does not of itself create contract rights. (3) An officer may resign by written notice to the corporation. The resignation is effective upon on its receipt by the corporation or at a subsequent time specified in the notice of resignation, including effectiveness determined on a future event or events. If effectiveness of a resignation is stated to be delayed and the board or the appointing officer accepts the delay, the board or the appointing officer may fill the pending vacancy before the delayed effectiveness, but the new officer may not take office until the vacancy occurs. Sec. 545b. (1) If a director or officer pursues or takes advantage of a business opportunity directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person, that action may not be enjoined, set aside, or give rise to an award of damages or other sanctions, in a proceeding by a shareholder or by or in the right of the corporation, on the ground that the opportunity should have first been offered to the corporation, if either of the following applies: (a) The corporation's articles of incorporation contain a provision adopted in accordance with section 209(1)(d) that renounces such opportunity. (b) Before the director, officer, or other person becomes legally obligated with respect to the opportunity, the director or officer brings the opportunity to the attention of the corporation and either of the following applies: (i) The board, a committee, or the independent director or directors disclaiming the corporation's interest in the opportunity take action in compliance with the procedures described in section 545a(1)(b) and (2). (ii) Shareholders take action disclaiming the corporation's interest in the opportunity in compliance with the procedures described in section 545a(1)(c) and (3), in either case as if the decision being made concerned a transaction in which a director or officer is determined to have an interest, except that rather than making disclosure of the material facts of the transaction and the director's or officer's interest, as required in section 545a, the director or officer shall have made prior disclosure to those acting on behalf of the corporation of all material facts concerning the business opportunity known to the director or officer. For purposes of this section and the test under section 545a(2), a director who has no interest in the transaction is every director except a director who pursues or takes advantage of the business opportunity directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person, or has a material relationship with a director or officer who pursues or takes advantage of the business opportunity directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person. For purposes of this section and the test under section 545a(3), a shareholder who does not have an interest in the transaction is every shareholder except a shareholder who pursues or takes advantage of the business opportunity directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person, or has a material relationship with a director or officer who pursues or takes advantage of the business opportunity directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person. (2) In a proceeding seeking equitable relief or other remedy based on an alleged improper pursuit or taking advantage of a business opportunity by a director or officer directly, or indirectly through or on behalf of another person, the fact that the director or officer did not employ the procedure described in subsection (1)(b)(i) or (ii) before pursuing or taking advantage of the opportunity does not create an implication that the opportunity should have been first presented to the corporation or alter the burden of proof otherwise applicable to establish that the director or officer breached a duty to the corporation in the circumstances. Sec. 564a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), an indemnification under section 561 or 562, unless ordered by the court or required under section 563, shall may be made by the corporation only as authorized in the specific case upon on a determination that indemnification of the director, officer, employee, or agent is proper in the circumstances because he or she the director, officer, employee, or agent has met the applicable standard of conduct set forth in under sections 561 and 562 and upon on an evaluation of the reasonableness of expenses and amounts paid in settlement. This determination and evaluation shall may be made in any of the following ways: (a) By a majority vote of a quorum of the board consisting of directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding. (b) If a quorum cannot be obtained under subdivision (a), by a majority vote of a committee duly designated by the board and consisting solely of 2 or more directors not at the time parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding. (c) In a written opinion by independent legal counsel selected in 1 of the following ways: (i) By the board or its committee in the manner prescribed in subdivision (a) or (b). (ii) If a quorum of the board cannot be obtained under subdivision (a) and a committee cannot be designated under subdivision (b), by the board. (d) By all independent directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding. (e) By the shareholders, but shares held by directors, officers, employees, or agents who are parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding may not be voted. (f) By 1 or more officers of the corporation to whom the board has delegated the authority to make the determinations required by this subsection, if the person seeking indemnification is not an officer or a director of the corporation. In the board's sole discretion, the board may impose limitations on the authority of any officer to make the determinations required by this subsection, such as materiality limitations. (2) In the designation of a committee under subsection (1)(b), or in the selection of independent legal counsel under subsection (1)(c)(ii), or in the delegation of authority to 1 or more officers under subsection (1)(f), all directors may participate. (3) If a person is entitled to indemnification under section 561 or 562 for a portion of expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, judgments, penalties, fines, and amounts paid in settlement, but not for the total amount, the corporation may indemnify the person for the portion of the expenses, judgments, penalties, fines, or amounts paid in settlement for which the person is entitled to be indemnified. (4) An authorization of payment of indemnification under this section shall may be made in any of the following ways: (a) By the board in 1 of the following ways: (i) If there are 2 or more directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding, by a majority vote of all directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties, a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum for this purpose. (ii) By a majority of the members of a committee of 2 or more directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding. (iii) If the corporation has 1 or more independent directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding, by a majority vote of all independent directors who are not parties or are threatened to be made parties, a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum for this purpose. (iv) If there are no independent directors and less than 2 directors who are not parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding, by the vote necessary for action by the board in accordance with section 523, in which authorization all directors may participate. (b) By the shareholders, but shares held by directors, officers, employees, or agents who are parties or threatened to be made parties to the action, suit, or proceeding may not be voted on the authorization. (c) By 1 or more officers of the corporation to whom the board has delegated the authority to make a payment of indemnification, if the person seeking indemnification is not an officer or a director of the corporation. In the board's sole discretion, the board may impose limitations on the authority of any officer to make a payment of indemnification, such as materiality limitations. (5) To the extent that the articles of incorporation include a provision eliminating or limiting the liability of a director pursuant to or officer in accordance with section 209(1)(c), a corporation may indemnify a director or officer for the expenses and liabilities described in this subsection without a determination that the director or officer has met the standard of conduct set forth in sections 561 and 562, but no indemnification may be made except to the extent authorized in section 564c if the director or officer received a financial benefit to which he or she the director or officer was not entitled, intentionally inflicted harm on the corporation or its shareholders, violated section 551, or intentionally committed a criminal act. In connection with an action or suit by or in the right of the corporation described in section 562, indemnification under this subsection may be for expenses, including attorneys' fees, actually and reasonably incurred. In connection with an action, suit, or proceeding other than an action, suit, or proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, as described in section 561, indemnification under this subsection may be for expenses, including attorneys' fees, actually and reasonably incurred, and for judgments, penalties, fines, and amounts paid in settlement actually and reasonably incurred. Sec. 711. (1) A domestic corporation owning not less than 90% of the outstanding shares of each class of another domestic corporation or corporations may merge the other corporation or corporations into itself, or may merge itself, or itself and any such subsidiary corporation or corporations, into any such subsidiary corporation, without approval of the shareholders of any of the corporations, except as provided in section 713. The board of the parent corporation shall approve a plan of merger setting forth those matters required to be set forth in a plan of merger under section 701. Approval by the board of any such subsidiary corporation is not required. (2) If the parent corporation owns less than 100% of the outstanding shares of any constituent subsidiary corporation, the parent corporation shall mail promptly after the filing of the certificate of merger give to each minority shareholder of record of each such subsidiary corporation, unless waived in writing, a written copy or summary of the plan of merger and shall comply with the provisions of this chapter respecting dissenters' rights. A written copy or summary under this subsection may be given personally, by mail, or by electronic transmission. (3) The grant of power to merge under this section does not preclude the effectuation of a merger as elsewhere provided in this act. Sec. 745. (1) A domestic corporation may convert into a business organization if all of the following requirements are satisfied: (a) The conversion is permitted by the law that will govern the internal affairs of the business organization after conversion and the surviving business organization complies with that law in converting. (b) Unless subdivision (d) applies, the board of the domestic corporation proposing to convert adopts a plan of conversion that includes all of the following: (i) The name of the domestic corporation, the name of the business organization into which the domestic corporation is converting, the type of business organization into which the domestic corporation is converting, identification of the statute that will govern the internal affairs of the surviving business organization, the street address of the surviving business organization, the street address of the domestic corporation if different from the street address of the surviving business organization, and the principal place of business of the surviving business organization. (ii) For the domestic corporation, the designation and number of outstanding shares of each class and series, specifying the classes and series entitled to vote, each class and series entitled to vote as a class, and, if the number of shares is subject to change before the effective date of the conversion, the manner in which the change may occur. (iii) The terms and conditions of the proposed conversion, including the manner and basis of converting the shares into ownership interests or obligations of the surviving business organization, into cash, into other consideration that may include ownership interests or obligations of an entity that is not a party to the conversion, or into a combination of cash and other consideration. (iv) The terms and conditions of the organizational documents that are to govern the surviving business organization. (v) Any other provisions with respect to the proposed conversion that the board considers necessary or desirable. (c) If the board adopts the plan of conversion under subdivision (b), the plan of conversion is submitted for approval in the same manner required for a merger under section 703a(2), including the procedures pertaining to dissenters' rights if any shareholder has the right to dissent under section 762. (d) If the domestic corporation has not commenced business, has not issued any shares, and has not elected a board, subdivisions (b) and (c) do not apply and the incorporators may approve of the conversion of the corporation into a business organization by unanimous consent. To effect the conversion, the majority of the incorporators must execute and file a certificate of conversion under subdivision (e). (e) After the plan of conversion is approved under subdivisions (b) and (c) or the conversion is approved under subdivision (d), the domestic corporation files any formation documents required to be filed under the laws governing the internal affairs of the surviving business organization, in the manner prescribed by those laws, and files a certificate of conversion with the administrator. The certificate of conversion shall must include all of the following: (i) Unless subdivision (d) applies, all of the information described in subdivision (b)(i) and (ii) and the manner and basis of converting the shares of the domestic corporation contained in the plan of conversion. (ii) Unless subdivision (d) applies, a statement that the board has adopted the plan of conversion by the board under subdivision (c), or if subdivision (d) applies to the conversion, a statement that the domestic corporation has not commenced business, has not issued any shares, and has not elected a board and that the plan of conversion was approved by the unanimous consent of the incorporators. (iii) A statement that the surviving business organization will furnish a copy of the plan of conversion, on request and without cost, to any shareholder of the domestic corporation. (iv) If approval of the shareholders of the domestic corporation was required, a statement that the plan was approved by the shareholders under subdivision (c). (v) A statement specifying each assumed name of the domestic corporation to be used by the surviving business organization and authorized under section 217(5). (2) Section 131 applies in determining when a certificate of conversion under this section becomes effective. (3) When a conversion under this section takes effect, all of the following apply: (a) The domestic corporation converts into the surviving business organization, and the articles of incorporation of the domestic corporation are canceled. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the surviving business organization is organized under and subject to the organizational laws of the jurisdiction of the surviving business organization as stated in the certificate of conversion. (b) The surviving business organization has all of the liabilities of the domestic corporation. The conversion of the domestic corporation into a business organization under this section shall does not be considered to affect any obligations or liabilities of the domestic corporation incurred before the conversion or the personal liability of any person incurred before the conversion, and the conversion shall does not be considered to affect the choice of law applicable to the domestic corporation with respect to matters arising before the conversion. (c) The title to all real estate and other property and rights owned by the domestic corporation remain vested in the surviving business organization without reversion or impairment. The rights, privileges, powers, and interests in property of the domestic corporation, as well as the debts, liabilities, and duties of the domestic corporation, shall are not be considered, as a consequence of the conversion, to have been transferred to the surviving business organization to which the domestic corporation has converted for any purpose of the laws of this state. (d) The surviving business organization may use the name and the assumed names of the domestic corporation if the filings required under section 217(5) or any other applicable statute are made and the laws regarding use and form of names are followed. (e) A proceeding pending against the domestic corporation may be continued as if the conversion had not occurred, or the surviving business organization may be substituted in the proceeding for the domestic corporation. (f) The surviving business organization is considered to be the same entity that existed before the conversion and is considered to be organized on the date that the domestic corporation was originally incorporated. (g) The shares of the domestic corporation that were to be converted into ownership interests or obligations of the surviving business organization or into cash or other property are converted. (h) Unless otherwise provided in a plan of conversion adopted in accordance with this section, the domestic corporation is not required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets on account of the conversion, and the conversion does not constitute a dissolution of the domestic corporation. (4) If the surviving business organization of a conversion under this section is a foreign business organization, it is subject to the laws of this state pertaining to the transaction of business in this state if it transacts business in this state. The surviving business organization is liable, and is subject to service of process in a proceeding in this state, for the enforcement of an obligation of the domestic corporation, and in a proceeding for the enforcement of a right of a dissenting shareholder of the domestic corporation against the surviving business organization. (5) If the conversion of a domestic corporation that is not a benefit corporation into a business organization would result in the shares of any voting group becoming, or being converted into or exchanged for the right to receive, shares or interests in a business organization that is subject to law that governs the internal affairs of the business organization that is analogous to those in chapter 9A, the conversion must comply with section 955(3). (6) (5) As used in this section and section 746, "business organization" and "entity" mean those terms as defined in section 736(1). Sec. 911. (1) A domestic corporation and each foreign corporation subject to chapter 10 shall file a report with the administrator no not later than May 15 of each year. The report shall must be on a form approved by the administrator, signed by an authorized officer or agent of the corporation, and contain all of the following information: (a) The name of the corporation. (b) The name of its the corporation's resident agent and address of its the corporation's registered office in this state. (c) The names and addresses of its the corporation's president, secretary, treasurer, and directors. (d) General The general nature and kind of business in which the corporation is engaged. (e) For each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, the total number of authorized shares and the most recent percentage used in computation of the tax required by the Michigan business tax act, 2007 PA 36, MCL 208.1101 to 208.1601.208.1519. (f) For each professional corporation, the names and addresses of its shareholders and a certification that both of the following are met: (i) Each shareholder is a licensed person in 1 or more of the professional services provided by the professional corporation. (ii) The corporation meets the other requirements of chapter 2A. (2) A corporation that is a benefit corporation shall include the annual benefit report that is required under section 961 with the report under subsection (1). (3) (2) A corporation that is formed or authorized to do business on or after January 1 and before May 16 of a calendar year is not required to file the report described in subsection (1) for that calendar year. (4) (3) If there are no changes in the information provided in the last filed report required under subsection (1), the corporation may file a report that certifies to the administrator that no changes in the required information have occurred since the last filed report. A report filed under this subsection shall must be on a form approved by the administrator and filed no not later than the date required under this section. 911.A corporation that is a benefit corporation that files a report under this subsection shall include the annual benefit report that is required under section 961 with that report. CHAPTER 9A BENEFIT CORPORATIONS Sec. 951. (1) As used in this chapter: (a) "Benefit enforcement proceeding" means a claim asserted or action brought directly by a benefit corporation, or derivatively on behalf of a benefit corporation, against a director for either of the following: (i) A failure to pursue a public benefit. (ii) A violation of a duty or standard of conduct under this chapter. (b) "Minimum status vote" means an authorization or approval of a corporate action that meets all of the following: (i) The shareholder approval or vote requirements of this act. (ii) Any shareholder approval or vote requirement that is included in a provision of the articles of incorporation. (iii) The approval by not less than 2/3 of the votes entitled to be cast on the corporate action, and, if a voting group is entitled to a vote as a separate group on the corporate action, the corporate action is approved by not less than 2/3 of the votes entitled to be cast by the voting group. (c) "Public benefit" includes either of the following purposes for which the corporation is formed, as identified in the articles of incorporation under section 953: (i) Creating a positive effect, or reducing a negative effect, for at least 1 community or category of persons, other than shareholders solely in the shareholders' capacity as shareholders, or on the environment. As used in this subparagraph, "effect" includes an effect that is artistic, charitable, economic, educational, cultural, literary, medical, religious, social, ecological, or scientific in nature. (ii) Acting in a responsible and sustainable manner. (d) "Responsible and sustainable manner" means the corporation does both of the following: (i) Pursues through the business of the corporation the creation of a positive effect, or a reduction of a negative effect, on society and the environment, that when taken as a whole, is material in light of the corporation's size and the nature of the corporation's business. (ii) Considers, in addition to the interests of the shareholders, the separate interests of stakeholders known to be affected by the conduct of the business of the corporation. (2) If there is a conflict between a specific provision of this chapter and a general provision of this act, the provision of this chapter applies with respect to a benefit corporation. Sec. 953. (1) A domestic corporation that meets both of the following is a benefit corporation and subject to this chapter: (a) The corporation is formed under this act. (b) The articles of incorporation of the corporation state that it is a benefit corporation. However, an amendment to the articles of incorporation to include the statement described in this subdivision is not effective unless it is adopted by a minimum status vote. (2) In addition to the purposes described in section 202(b), the purposes of a benefit corporation must include 1 or more public benefits, which must be identified in 1 or more provisions in the articles of incorporation. (3) An amendment to the articles of incorporation of a benefit corporation to change the purposes of the corporation by adding, amending, or deleting 1 or more public benefits is not effective unless it is adopted by a minimum status vote. (4) A benefit corporation may terminate its status as a benefit corporation by amending its articles of incorporation to remove its public benefits. However, an amendment to the articles of incorporation described in this subsection is not effective unless it is adopted by a minimum status vote. Sec. 955. (1) In addition to the requirements of chapter 7, if a domestic corporation that is not a benefit corporation is a constituent corporation in a merger or an exchanging corporation in a share exchange, and the surviving or acquiring corporation will be a benefit corporation under the plan of merger or share exchange, the plan must be approved by a minimum status vote of that constituent or exchanging corporation. (2) In addition to the requirements of chapter 7, if a benefit corporation is a constituent corporation in a merger or an exchanging corporation in a share exchange, and the surviving or acquiring corporation will not be a benefit corporation under the plan of merger or share exchange, the plan must be approved by a minimum status vote of that constituent or exchanging corporation. (3) In addition to the requirements of chapter 7, if the conversion of a domestic corporation that is not a benefit corporation into a business organization would result in the shares of any voting group becoming, or being converted into or exchanged for the right to receive, shares or interests in a business organization that is subject to law that governs the internal affairs of the business organization that is analogous to those in this chapter, the conversion must be approved by a minimum status vote of the domestic corporation. However, if the conversion would affect the shares of 1 or more, but not all, of the voting groups, a minimum status vote is required only with respect to the shares in the voting groups affected by the conversion. (4) In addition to the requirements of chapter 7, if the conversion of a benefit corporation into a business organization would result in the shares of a voting group of the benefit corporation becoming, or being converted into or exchanged for the right to receive, shares or interests in a business organization that is not subject to law that governs the internal affairs of the business organization that is analogous to those in this chapter, the conversion must be approved by a minimum status vote of the benefit corporation. However, if the conversion would affect the shares of 1 or more, but not all, of the voting groups, a minimum status vote is required only with respect to the shares in the voting group affected by the conversion. (5) In addition to the requirements of chapter 7, if the conversion of a benefit corporation into a business organization would result in the shares of a voting group of the benefit corporation becoming, or being converted into or exchanged for the right to receive, shares or interests in a business organization that is subject to law that governs the internal affairs of the business organization that is analogous to those in this chapter, the conversion does not require a minimum status vote. (6) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if a corporate action would result in all shares of 1 or more voting groups being converted into the right to receive cash or cash equivalents, approval of the transaction by a minimum status vote of such voting group or groups is not required under this section. (7) As used in this section, "business organization" means that term as defined in section 736. Sec. 957. (1) The board of a benefit corporation shall consider all of the following: (a) The interests of the shareholders. (b) The separate interest of stakeholders known to be affected by the conduct of the business of the corporation. (c) Each public benefit. (2) A consideration made by a director of a benefit corporation under subsection (1) in the discharge of the director's duties does not constitute a violation of section 541a. (3) A director who makes a business judgment in good faith fulfills the director's duties under this section if the director is not interested in the subject of the business judgment and is informed with respect to the subject of the business judgment to the extent that the director reasonably believes appropriate under the circumstances. (4) A director of a benefit corporation is not liable for monetary damages to the corporation, the shareholders, or any person that claims to be a beneficiary of a public benefit for a failure to fulfill a duty arising under this chapter or solely because the director performed duties in compliance with this section. (5) A director of a benefit corporation does not have a duty to a person that is a beneficiary of a public benefit arising from the status of the person as a beneficiary. Sec. 959. (1) The duties of any director of a benefit corporation arising under this chapter or any public benefit may be enforced only in a benefit enforcement proceeding under this section. A person shall not bring an action or assert a claim against a benefit corporation or its directors with respect to the duties under this chapter of any directors of the benefit corporation or any public benefit except in a benefit enforcement proceeding under this section. (2) A benefit enforcement proceeding may be commenced or maintained only by 1 of the following: (a) Directly, by the benefit corporation. (b) Derivatively, by any of the following: (i) A shareholder of the benefit corporation that owns beneficially or of record, individually or collectively, as of the date the benefit enforcement proceeding is instituted, either of the following: (A) Not less than 5% of the corporation's outstanding shares. (B) If the shares of the benefit corporation are listed on a national securities exchange, 5% of the corporation's outstanding shares, or shares that have a market value of $5,000,000.00, whichever is less. (ii) Any other person specified in the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the benefit corporation. (3) A benefit corporation and its directors are not liable for monetary damages under this chapter for any failure of the benefit corporation to pursue or create a public benefit. (4) An action against a director for failure to perform a duty imposed under this chapter must be commenced not later than 3 years after the cause of action has accrued, or not later than 2 years after the time when the cause of action is discovered or should reasonably have been discovered by the complainant, whichever occurs first. Sec. 961. (1) A benefit corporation shall prepare an annual benefit report that includes all of the following: (a) A summary addressing the efforts of the benefit corporation during the preceding year to pursue its public benefits. (b) The objectives that the board has established for the corporation to pursue its public benefits. (c) The standards that the board has adopted to measure the corporation's progress in pursuing its public benefits. (d) If the articles of incorporation or bylaws require that the corporation use an independent third-party standard in reporting on the corporation's progress in pursuing its public benefits, or if the board has chosen to use a third-party standard, a summary of the third-party standard. (e) An assessment of the corporation's success in meeting the objectives and standards under subdivisions (b) and (c), and subdivision (d), as applicable, and the basis of the assessment. (2) Subject to subsection (3), a benefit corporation shall, not later than 4 months after the end of the fiscal year of the benefit corporation, deliver to each shareholder, or make available and provide written notice of the availability to each shareholder, a copy of the annual benefit report described in subsection (1). (3) The benefit corporation may distribute the annual benefit report described in subsection (1) by electronic transmission or by making the annual benefit report available for electronic transmission. If the annual benefit report is distributed electronically under this subsection, the corporation must provide the annual benefit report in written form, if requested by a shareholder. (4) A shareholder that has not received or been given access to an annual benefit report in the time described in subsection (2) may make a written request that the corporation deliver or make the annual benefit report available to the shareholder. (5) If a benefit corporation subject to a request under subsection (4) does not deliver or make the annual benefit report available to the shareholders within 5 business days after receiving the request under subsection (4), the requesting shareholder may petition the circuit court of the county in which the corporation's principal place of business or registered office is located for an order requiring the delivery of, or access to, the annual benefit report. (6) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7), a benefit corporation shall post its 3 most recent annual benefit reports on the public portion of its website. (7) If a benefit corporation does not have a website, the benefit corporation shall provide a copy of its most recent annual benefit report, without charge, to a person that submits a written request to the benefit corporation for a copy of its most recent annual benefit report. (8) A benefit corporation shall include a copy of its annual benefit report with the report it is required to file with the administrator under section 911. A benefit corporation shall pay a fee of $25.00 when the annual benefit report is delivered to the administrator. The administrator's filing of a benefit report does not relate to the validity or invalidity of the information contained in the annual benefit report. Sec. 1002. (1) A foreign corporation that receives a certificate of authority under this act, until a certificate of revocation or of withdrawal is issued under this act, has the same rights and privileges as a domestic corporation organized for the purposes set forth described in the application pursuant to for which the certificate of authority is issued. Except as otherwise provided in this act, the corporation is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities of a similar domestic corporation. (2) This act does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.The law of the jurisdiction of formation of a foreign corporation governs the internal affairs of the foreign corporation. (3) A foreign corporation is not precluded from receiving a certificate of authority because of a difference between the law of the foreign corporation's jurisdiction of formation and the law of this state. Sec. 1060. (1) When delivering a document described in this subsection to the administrator for filing, a person shall pay the administrator whichever of the following fees apply to that document: (a) Articles of a domestic corporation, $10.00. (b) Application of a foreign corporation for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, $10.00. (c) Amendment to the articles of a domestic corporation, $10.00. (d) Amended application for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, $10.00. (e) Certificate of merger, conversion, or share exchange under chapter 7, $50.00. (f) Certificate attesting to the occurrence of a merger or conversion of a foreign corporation under section 1021, $10.00. (g) Certificate of dissolution, $10.00. (h) Application for withdrawal and issuance of a certificate of withdrawal of a foreign corporation, $10.00. (i) Application for reservation of corporate name, $10.00. (j) Certificate of assumed name or a certificate of termination of assumed name, $10.00. (k) Statement of change of registered office or resident agent, $5.00. (l) Restated articles of domestic corporations, $10.00. (m) Certificate of abandonment, $10.00. (n) Certificate of correction, $10.00. (o) Certificate of revocation of dissolution proceedings, $10.00. (p) Certificate of renewal of corporate existence, $10.00. (q) For examining a special report required by law, $2.00. (r) Certificate of registration of corporate name of a foreign corporation, $50.00. (s) Certificate of renewal of registration of corporate name of a foreign corporation, $50.00. (t) Certificate of termination of registration of corporate name of a foreign corporation, $10.00. (u) Report required under section 911, $15.00 if paid after September 30, 2027. Before October 1, 2027, the fee is $25.00. (v) Certificate of validation under section 158, $50.00. (2) The fees described in subsection (1) are in addition to any franchise fees prescribed in this act. The administrator shall not refund all or any part of a fee described in this section. (3) Except as provided in subsection (9), the administrator shall deposit all fees received and collected under this section in the state treasury to the credit of the administrator, who may only use the money credited in accordance with legislative appropriation and only in carrying out those duties of the department required by law. (4) The fees described in this section apply to documents filed by a domestic or foreign regulated investment company as that term is defined in section 1064. (5) If any money received by the administrator from fees paid under subsection (1)(u) is not appropriated to the department in that fiscal year, the money remaining from those fees reverts to the general fund of this state. (6) A minimum charge of $1.00 for each certificate and 50 cents per folio must be paid to the administrator for certifying a part of a file or record pertaining to a corporation if a fee for that service is not described in subsection (1). The administrator may furnish copies of documents, reports, and papers required or permitted by law to be filed with the administrator, and shall charge for those copies the fee established in a schedule of fees adopted by the administrator with the approval of the state administrative board. The administrator shall retain the revenue collected under this subsection, and the department shall use it to defray the costs for its copying and certifying services. (7) If a domestic or foreign corporation pays fees or penalties by check and the check is dishonored, or by credit card and a chargeback is successful, the fee is unpaid and the administrator shall rescind the filing of all related documents. (8) The administrator may accept a credit card in lieu instead of cash or check as payment of a fee under this act. The administrator shall determine which credit cards the administrator accepts for payment. (9) The administrator may charge a nonrefundable fee of not more than $50.00 for any document submitted or certificate sent by facsimile or electronic transmission. The administrator shall retain the revenue collected under this subsection and the department shall use it to carry out its duties required by law. (10) The administrator shall waive any fee otherwise required under this section if a majority of the shares of the domestic or foreign corporation responsible for paying the fee are, and the corporation provides proof satisfactory to the administrator that those shares are, held by 1 or more honorably discharged veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States.